en: French pralines
de: Französciche pralinen
fr: Pralines
hr: Francuske praline
it: Praline francesi
nl: Franse praliné

en: Dragées, Sugar-coated almond
de: Dragées, Dragees
es: Grageados
fi: drageet
fr: Dragées
hr: Dražeje
lt: Dražė
nl: Dragees

en: Gozinaki, gozinaqi
xx: Gozinaki
de: Gosinaki
fr: Gozinaki
hr: Gozinaki
nl: Gozinaki
ru: Козинаки

en: Caramels
bg: Карамели
de: Karamellen
es: Caramelos
fi: kinuskit
fr: Caramels
hr: Karamele
it: Caramello
ja: キャラメル
lt: Karameliniai saldainiai
nl: Caramels
ru: Карамель
tr: Karamel

en: Liquid caramel
de: Flüßiges Karamel
es: Caramelo líquido
fi: nestemäinen kinuski
fr: caramel liquide, caramel liquides
hr: Tekući karamel
ja: カラメル
lt: Skysta karamelė
nl: Vloeibare caramels
tr: Sıvı karamel

en: Soft caramel candy
fi: Pehmeät kinuskimakeiset
fr: Bonbon au caramel mou
hr: Mekani karamel bombon
lt: Minkšti karameliniai saldainiai
nl: Zachte caramelsnoep

en: Salted butter caramels
de: Salziges Butterkaramel, Salzige Butterkaramellen
fi: suolatoffeet
fr: Caramels au beurre salé
hr: Karamele od slanog maslaca
it: Caramello al burro salato
lt: Sūdyti karamelės kremai
nl: Caramels met gezouten boter

en: Chewing gums, chewing-gum
bg: Дъвки
ca: Xiclets
da: Tyggegummier
de: Kaugummis, Kaugummi
es: Chicles, Goma de mascar, Gomas de mascar
fi: purukumi
fr: Chewing-gum, gomme à mâcher, pâte à mâcher, chiclette, chique, chiclet, bubble-gum
he: מסטיק, מסטיקים ללעיסה
hr: Žvakaća guma
it: Gomme da masticare
ja: チューインガム
lt: Kramtomosios gumos
nb: Tyggegummier
nl: Kauwgom
nn: Tyggegummiar, Tyggjegummiar
pl: Guma do żucia
pt: Pastilhas elásticas
ro: Gumă de mestecat
ru: Жевательная резинка
sv: Tuggummin

en: Sugar-free chewing gum, Chewing gum without sugar
bg: Дъвки без захар
da: Sukkerfrie tyggegummier, Sukkerfrit tyggegummi, Tyggegummier uden sukker
de: zuckerfreie Kaugummis, zuckerfreier Kaugummi
es: Chicles sin azúcar, Goma de mascar sin azúcar, Gomas de mascar sin azúcar
fi: sokeriton purukumi
fr: Chewing-gum sans sucres, Chewing-gums sans sucre, Chewing-gum sans sucre, Chewing-gums sans sucres
he: מסטיק נטול סוכר, מסטיק ללא סוכר
hr: Žvakaća guma bez šećera
it: Gomme da masticare senza zucchero
lt: Becukrės kramtomosios gumos, Kramtomosios gumos be cukraus
nb: Sukkerfrie tyggegummier
nl: Kauwgom (suikervrij), Suikervrije kauwgom
nn: Sukkerfrie tyggegummiar, Sukkerfrie tyggjegummiar
pl: bezcukrowa guma do żucia
pt: Pastilhas elásticas sem açucar
ro: Gumă de mestecat fără zahăr
ru: Жевательная резинка без сахара
sv: Sockerfria tuggummin, Sockerfritt tuggummi, Tuggummin utan socker
zh: 无糖口香糖

en: Chewing gum with sugar
da: Tyggegummier med sukker
de: Kaugummi mit Zucker
es: Chicle con azúcar
fr: Chewing-gum sucré
hr: Žvakaća guma sa šećerom
it: Gomma da masticare con zucchero
lt: Kramtomosios gumos su cukrumi
nl: Kauwgom met suiker
sv: Tuggummin med socker, Tuggummi med socker

en: French confectioneries
de: Französischer Konfekt, Französische Konditorwaren
fi: ranskalaiset sokerileipomotuotteet
fr: Confiseries de France
hr: Francuskih slastičarnica
it: Pasticceria francese
nl: Franse bonbons
zh: 法国糖果

en: Confectioneries of Nord-Pas-de-Calais
de: Konfekt aus Nord-Pas-de-Calais, Konditorwaren aus Nord-Pas-de-Calais
fr: Confiseries du Nord-Pas-de-Calais
hr: Slastičarnice nord-pas-de-calais
nl: Suikergoed uit Nord-Pas-de-Calais in Frankrijk

en: nougats, nougat
af: Nougat
ar: نوغة
az: Nuqa
bg: Нуга
ca: nogat
cs: nugát
cy: Nyget
da: nougat
de: Nougats, Nougat
el: Μαντολάτο
eo: Nugato
es: nougat
et: Nugat
eu: Nogat
fa: نوقا
fi: Nougat
fr: nougats, nougat, türkischer Honig
ga: Eithneagán
gl: nougat
he: נוגט
hr: Nugati
hu: nugát
hy: Նուգա
id: Nougat
io: Nugato
it: mandorlato
ja: ヌガー
ko: 누가
la: Nucatum
lb: Nougat
lt: nuga
lv: nuga
ml: നൂഗാ
nb: nougat
nl: noga, nougat, nougats, nogas
oc: Nogat
pl: nugat
pt: nougat
ro: Nuga
ru: нуга
sk: Nugát
sl: nugat
sr: Нугат
sv: nougat
tr: Nuga
uk: Нуга
vi: Kẹo Hạnh Phúc
zh: 牛轧糖

en: Chocolate nougats
de: Nougatschokolade, Schokolade mit Nougat
fr: nougats au chocolat, nougat au chocolat
hr: Čokoladni nugati
lt: Šokoladinės nugos
nl: Noga met chocola
zh: 巧克力牛扎糖

en: White nougat
de: Weißer Nougat
es: Turrón Blanco
fi: valkoinen nugaa
fr: Nougats blancs, nougat blanc
hr: Bijeli nugat
it: Torrone bianco
lt: Baltos nugos
nl: Witte noga
zh: 白牛扎糖

en: Chinese nougats
de: Chinesischer Nougat
fr: Nougats chinois, nougat chinois
hr: Kineski nugati
lt: Kinietiškos nugos
nl: Chinese noga
zh: 中国牛扎糖, 中式牛扎糖

en: Nougats from Montélimar
de: Nougat aus Montélimar
es: Nougats de Montélimar, Turrones De Montélimar
fr: nougats de Montélimar, nougat de Montélimar
hr: Nugati iz Montélimara
it: Torrone di Montélimar
lt: Nugos iš Montélimar
nl: Noga uit Montélimar

en: Nougats from Sault
de: Nougat aus Sault
fr: Nougats de Sault, nougat de Sault
hr: Nugati od saulta
lt: Nugos iš Sault

en: Nougats from Tours
de: Nougat aus Tours
fr: Nougats de Tours, nougat de Tours
hr: Nugati iz tura
lt: Nugos iš Tours

en: Black nougat
de: Dunkler Nougat
fr: Nougats noirs, nougat noir
hr: Crni nugat
lt: Juodos nugos
nl: Donkere noga
zh: 黑牛扎糖